Missouri, session 2026, SB1653.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 160.522, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 160.522,
3 to read as follows:
1 160.522. 1. The [department of elementary and
2 secondary education shall produce or cause to be produced,
3 at least annually, a school] state board of education shall
4 develop an annual accountability report card for each public
5 school district, each public school building in a school
6 district, and each public charter school in the state for
7 the purpose of providing information about school
8 performance in accordance with the provisions of this
9 section. In addition to providing information about student
10 performance, the report card shall be designed to satisfy
11 [state and] federal reporting requirements for the
12 disclosure of [statistics] information about students,
13 staff, finances, [academic achievement,] and other
14 [indicators] data. [The purpose of the report card shall be
15 to provide educational statistics and accountability
16 information for parents, taxpayers, school personnel,
17 legislators, and the print and broadcast news media in a
18 standardized, easily accessible form] Accountability report
19 cards shall be designed in a standardized, clear, and easily
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS SBs 1653 & 1194 2
20 accessible form so that they can be easily understood by
21 parents, taxpayers, school personnel, legislators, and the
22 media.
23 2. [(1) The department of elementary and secondary
24 education shall develop a standard form for the school
25 accountability report card.
26 (2) The information reported shall include, but not be
27 limited to, the following information reported by each
28 school district or charter school:
29 (a) The most recent accreditation rating;
30 (b) Enrollment;
31 (c) Rates of pupil attendance;
32 (d) High school dropout rate and graduation rate;
33 (e) The number and rate of suspensions of ten days or
34 longer and expulsions of pupils;
35 (f) The district or charter school ratio of students
36 to administrators and students to classroom teachers;
37 (g) The average years of experience of professional
38 staff and advanced degrees earned;
39 (h) Student achievement and grade-level equivalence
40 data as measured through the statewide assessment system
41 developed pursuant to section 160.518;
42 (i) Student scores on the ACT, along with the
43 percentage of graduates taking the test;
44 (j) Average teachers' and administrators' salaries
45 compared to the state averages;
46 (k) Average per-pupil current expenditures for the
47 district or charter school as a whole and by attendance
48 center as reported to the department of elementary and
49 secondary education;
50 (l) The adjusted tax rate of the district or charter
51 school;

SCS SBs 1653 & 1194 3
52 (m) The assessed valuation of the district;
53 (n) The percentage of the district or charter school
54 operating budget received from state, federal, and local
55 sources;
56 (o) The percentage of students eligible for free or
57 reduced-price lunch;
58 (p) Data on the percentage of students continuing
59 their education in postsecondary programs;
60 (q) Information about the job placement rate for
61 students who complete district or charter school vocational
62 education programs;
63 (r) Whether the school district or charter school
64 currently has a state-approved gifted education program; and
65 (s) The percentage and number of students who are
66 currently being served in the district's or charter school's
67 state-approved gifted education program] The state board of
68 education shall assign the duties of implementing the
69 provisions of this section to the department of elementary
70 and secondary education or may contract with a private
71 entity in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.
72 3. [The report card shall permit the disclosure of
73 data on a school-by-school basis, but the reporting shall
74 not be personally identifiable to any student or education
75 professional in the state] The state board of education
76 shall provide an embargoed version of the school
77 accountability report cards for the previous school year to
78 each public school district, public school, and public
79 charter school by September fifteenth of each year.
80 4. [The report card shall identify each school or
81 attendance center that has been identified as a priority
82 school under sections 160.720 and 161.092. The report also
83 shall identify attendance centers that have been categorized

SCS SBs 1653 & 1194 4
84 under federal law as needing improvement or requiring
85 specific school improvement strategies] Within thirty-six
86 hours of delivering the embargoed version of the report
87 cards to public school districts, public schools, and public
88 charter schools, the department of elementary and secondary
89 education shall publish in a clear and easily accessible
90 location on its website the district and school
91 accountability report cards for the previous school year.
92 5. [The report card shall not limit or discourage
93 other methods of public reporting and accountability by
94 local school districts. Districts shall provide information
95 included in the report card to parents, community members,
96 the print and broadcast news media, and legislators by
97 December first annually or as soon thereafter as the
98 information is available to the district, giving preference
99 to methods that incorporate the reporting into substantive
100 official communications such as student report cards. The
101 school district shall provide a printed copy of the district-
102 level or school-level report card to any patron upon request
103 and shall make reasonable efforts to supply businesses such
104 as, but not limited to, real estate and employment firms
105 with copies or other information about the reports so that
106 parents and businesses from outside the district who may be
107 contemplating relocation have access] By September thirtieth
108 of each year, each public school district, public school,
109 and public charter school shall publish in a clear and
110 easily accessible location on its website the district and
111 school accountability report cards from the previous school
112 year.
113 6. [For purposes of completing and distributing the
114 annual report card as prescribed in this section, a school
115 district may include the data from a charter school located

SCS SBs 1653 & 1194 5
116 within such school district, provided the local board of
117 education or special administrative board for such district
118 and the charter school reach mutual agreement for the
119 inclusion of the data from the charter school and the terms
120 of such agreement are approved by the state board of
121 education. The charter school shall not be required to be a
122 part of the local educational agency of such school district
123 and may maintain a separate local educational agency status]
124 The state board of education shall assign each public school
125 district, public school, and public charter school one of
126 the following ratings, which shall be based on a zero to one
127 hundred scale:
128 (1) "A" for those districts and schools producing
129 excellent student outcomes;
130 (2) "B" for those districts and schools producing more
131 than satisfactory student outcomes;
132 (3) "C" for those districts and schools producing
133 satisfactory student outcomes;
134 (4) "D" for those districts and schools producing less
135 than satisfactory student outcomes; and
136 (5) "F" for those districts and schools failing to
137 produce adequate student outcomes.
138 7. A public school district, public school, or public
139 charter school that does not test at least ninety-five
140 percent of its students in the state-mandated annual
141 summative assessment shall have its rating lowered by one
142 level.
143 8. The department of elementary and secondary
144 education shall use a criteria-referenced growth measure,
145 called "growth to proficiency", in addition to the existing
146 normative value-added growth measure. Growth to proficiency
147 shall evaluate for each student with two consecutive years

SCS SBs 1653 & 1194 6
148 of Missouri assessment program performance levels whether
149 that student has made sufficient academic progress to put
150 such student on a trajectory to reach grade-level
151 proficiency within three years or by grade ten, whichever
152 comes first.
153 9. The rating for a public school district, public
154 school, or public charter school shall be based on the
155 following factors:
156 (1) Student academic achievement status, calculated as
157 the percentage of students proficient or higher, on required
158 English language arts, mathematics, and science assessments
159 through the Missouri assessment program;
160 (2) Student academic growth in English language arts,
161 mathematics, and science using growth to proficiency and a
162 value-added growth metric:
163 (a) Of all students; and
164 (b) Of the lowest performing quartile of students;
165 (3) For high schools:
166 (a) Student four-year graduation rate;
167 (b) A success ready graduate measure, calculated by
168 the department of elementary and secondary education. The
169 measure shall include the number of students graduating with
170 merit or distinction, including consideration of advanced
171 placement scores of 3 or greater, International
172 Baccalaureate program credit scores of 4 or greater, dual
173 enrollment in core subjects with C course grade or higher,
174 passing an industry recognized credential or career
175 technical education certificate for a high-wage or high-
176 demand occupation, completion of an early associate or
177 baccalaureate degree, and completion of stackable
178 credentials.

SCS SBs 1653 & 1194 7
179 10. For schools serving students in any of grades
180 kindergarten through grade eight, the rating assigned shall
181 be based on overall student academic achievement level,
182 value-added growth, and growth to proficiency. Achievement
183 level, value-added academic growth, and growth to
184 proficiency shall be calculated and reported separately for
185 English language arts, mathematics, and science. As a
186 portion of the rating assigned, academic achievement level
187 shall represent forty percent of the rating, value-added
188 growth shall represent thirty percent of the rating, and
189 growth to proficiency shall represent thirty percent of the
190 rating.
191 11. For high schools, at least seventy-five percent of
192 the rating assigned shall be based on overall student
193 academic achievement level, value-added growth, and growth
194 to proficiency. Achievement level, value-added academic
195 growth, and growth to proficiency shall be calculated and
196 reported separately for English language arts, mathematics,
197 and science. As a portion of the rating assigned, academic
198 achievement level shall represent twenty-five percent of the
199 rating, value-added growth shall represent twenty-five
200 percent of the rating, growth to proficiency shall represent
201 twenty-five percent of the rating, the success ready
202 graduate measure shall represent fifteen percent of the
203 rating, and the student four-year graduation rate shall
204 represent ten percent of the rating.
205 12. Public school districts, public schools, and
206 public charter schools shall also report, for high schools,
207 the number of graduates who, within six months of
208 graduation, attend postsecondary education or training
209 programs, serve in the military or in national or community
210 service, or are employed in a skilled workforce position as

SCS SBs 1653 & 1194 8
211 determined by a governmental agency or nongovernmental
212 organization with expertise in skilled workforce positions.
213 13. For school districts, the annual report shall
214 follow the same method used for calculating a school grade
215 except at the district level.
216 14. The department of elementary and secondary
217 education shall develop a statewide report card that
218 provides the following:
219 (1) The percentages of Missouri students annually
220 attending schools rated "A", "B", "C", "D", and "F", with
221 the objective of increasing the percentage of students
222 attending more highly rated schools each year; and
223 (2) The performance of Missouri students on state
224 assessments relative to the National Assessment of
225 Educational Progress (NAEP), with the objective that
226 proficiency rates on both assessments be reasonably aligned.
227 15. The A-F grading scale for public schools and
228 public charter schools shall automatically increase to
229 ensure rigor in the calculation such that when success is
230 achieved, the following school year, expectations are raised
231 so performance does not stagnate. When sixty-five percent
232 of schools earn an "A" or a "B", the following school year,
233 the school grading scale shall increase by five percentage
234 points to earn an "A", "B", "C", and "D".
235 16. For purposes of this section, except as required
236 under federal law, the development and publication of an
237 annual school accountability report card shall not be
238 required for any special school district or state-operated
239 school in which all of the students enrolled are students
240 with disabilities.
✓